Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4650.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 39. (1) Offense variable 9 is number of victims. Score offense variable 9 by determining which of the following apply and by assigning the number of points attributable to the one that has the highest number of points: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 (a) Multiple deaths occurred 100 points (b) Multiple companion animals were killed 50 points (c) (b) There were 10 or more victims who were placed in danger of physical injury or death, or 20 or more victims who were placed in danger of property loss 25 points (d) There were 10 or more companion animals who were placed in danger of physical injury or death 15 points (e) (c) There were 2 to 9 victims who were placed in danger of physical injury or death, or 4 to 19 victims who were placed in danger of property loss 10 points (f) There were 2 to 9 companion animals who were placed in danger of physical injury or death 5 points (g) (d) There were fewer than 2 victims who were placed in danger of physical injury or death, or fewer than 4 victims who were placed in danger of property loss 0 points (2) All of the following apply to scoring offense variable 9: (a) Count Assign points for each person or companion animal who was placed in danger of physical injury or loss of life or property. as a victim. (b) Score 100 points only in homicide cases. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4646 (request no. H02034'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.